Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,113
Board of Parole and employees; access to offender; reports on conduct and character.

The Board of Parole and its employees shall have access at all reasonable times to any committed offender over whom the board may have jurisdiction and shall have means provided for communication with and observing the committed offender. The board shall be furnished such reports as it may require concerning the conduct and character of any committed offender and any other information deemed pertinent by the board in determining whether a committed offender should be paroled.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 44, p. 3095;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 13, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 677, § 9.